Hawaii statutes.
[§166E-4] Conversion of qualified and
encumbered other agricultural lands. The department shall establish
criteria and rules pursuant to chapter 91 and subject to approval by the board
to convert qualified and encumbered non-agricultural park lands to department
leases or other forms of encumbrance. [L 2003, c 90, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next